Indiana, session 2026, HB1202.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-2-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.122-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The institute is established to do the following:
(1) Evaluate state and local programs associated with:
(A) the prevention, detection, and solution of criminal
offenses;
(B) law enforcement; and
(C) the administration of criminal and juvenile justice.
(2) Participate in statewide collaborative efforts to improve all
aspects of law enforcement, juvenile justice, and criminal justice
in this state.
(3) Stimulate criminal and juvenile justice research.
(4) Develop new methods for the prevention and reduction of
crime.
(5) Prepare applications for funds under the Omnibus Act and the
Juvenile Justice Act.
(6) Administer victim and witness assistance funds.
(7) Administer the traffic safety functions assigned to the institute
under IC 9-27-2.
(8) Compile and analyze information and disseminate the
information to persons who make criminal justice decisions in this
state.
HEA 1202

2
(9) Serve as the criminal justice statistical analysis center for this
state.
(10) Identify grants and other funds that can be used by the
department of correction to carry out its responsibilities
concerning sex or violent offender registration under IC 11-8-8.
(11) Administer the application and approval process for
designating an area of a consolidated or second class city as a
public safety improvement area under IC 36-8-19.5.
(12) (11) Administer funds for the support of any sexual offense
services.
(13) (12) Administer funds for the support of domestic violence
programs.
(14) (13) Administer funds to support assistance to victims of
human sexual trafficking offenses as provided in IC 35-42-3.5-4.
(15) (14) Administer the domestic violence prevention and
treatment fund under IC 5-2-6.7.
(16) (15) Administer the family violence and victim assistance
fund under IC 5-2-6.8.
(17) (16) Monitor and evaluate the status of Indiana's criminal
justice system under IC 5-2-6-24.
(18) Administer the ignition interlock inspection account
established under IC 9-30-8-7.
(19) (17) Identify any federal, state, or local grants that can be
used to assist in the funding and operation of regional holding
facilities under IC 11-12-6.5.
(20) (18) Coordinate with state and local criminal justice agencies
for the collection and transfer of data from sheriffs concerning
jail:
(A) populations; and
(B) statistics;
for the purpose of providing jail data to the management
performance hub established by IC 4-3-26-8.
(21) (19) Establish and administer the Indiana crime guns task
force fund under IC 36-8-25.5-8.
(22) (20) Establish and administer:
(A) the juvenile diversion and community alternatives grant
program fund under IC 31-40-5; and
(B) the juvenile behavioral health competitive grant program
fund under IC 31-40-6.
SECTION 2. IC 5-2-13-10 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 10. The board of trustees of the criminal justice institute
shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this chapter.
HEA 1202

3
SECTION 3. IC 9-14-12-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2024,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) For each individual licensed by the bureau
to operate a motor vehicle, the bureau shall create and maintain a
driving record that contains the following:
(1) The individual's convictions for any of the following:
(A) A moving traffic violation.
(B) Operating a vehicle without financial responsibility in
violation of IC 9-25.
(2) Any administrative penalty imposed by the bureau.
(3) Any suspensions, revocations, or reinstatements of the
individual's driving privileges, license, or permit.
(4) If the driving privileges of the individual have been suspended
or revoked by the bureau, an entry in the record stating that a
notice of suspension or revocation was mailed to the individual by
the bureau or sent electronically if the individual has indicated a
preference for receiving notices from the bureau electronically,
and the date of the mailing or sending of the notice.
(5) Any requirement that the individual may operate only a motor
vehicle equipped with a certified registered ignition interlock
device.
A driving record may not contain voter registration information.
(b) For an Indiana resident who does not hold any type of valid
driving license, the bureau shall maintain a driving record as provided
in IC 9-24-18-9.
SECTION 4. IC 9-19-11-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.23-2020,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The child restraint system account is
established within the state general fund to make grants under
subsection (d).
(b) The account consists of the following:
(1) Funds collected as judgments for violations under this chapter.
(2) Appropriations to the account from the general assembly.
(3) Grants, gifts, and donations intended for deposit in the
account.
(4) Interest that accrues from money in the account.
(c) The account shall be administered by the criminal justice
institute.
(d) The criminal justice institute shall use money in the account to
make grants to entities specified in IC 5-2-6-10 to:
(1) purchase child restraint systems; and
(2) distribute the child restraint systems:
HEA 1202

4
(A) without charge; or
(B) for a minimal charge;
to persons who are not otherwise able to afford to purchase child
restraint systems.
The criminal justice institute shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this section.
(e) Money in the account is appropriated continuously to the
criminal justice institute for the purposes stated in subsection (a).
(f) The expenses of administering the account shall be paid from
money in the account.
(g) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the account not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the account in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the account.
(h) Money in the account at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
SECTION 5. IC 9-24-18-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2024,
SECTION 39, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The bureau may establish a driving record
for an Indiana resident who does not hold any type of valid driving
license. The driving record shall be established for an unlicensed driver
when the bureau receives an abstract of court conviction for the type of
conviction that would appear on an official driver's record.
(b) If an unlicensed driver applies for and receives any type of
driver's license in Indiana, the individual's driving record as an
unlicensed driver shall be recorded on the permanent record file.
(c) The bureau shall also certify traffic violation convictions on the
driving record of an unlicensed driver who subsequently receives an
Indiana driver's license.
(d) A driving record established under this section must include the
following:
(1) The individual's convictions for any of the following:
(A) A moving traffic violation.
(B) Operating a vehicle without financial responsibility in
violation of IC 9-25.
(2) Any administrative penalty imposed by the bureau.
(3) Any suspensions, revocations, or reinstatements of the
individual's driving privileges, license, or permit.
(4) If the driving privileges of the individual have been suspended
or revoked by the bureau, an entry in the record stating that a
notice of suspension or revocation was mailed to the individual by
the bureau or sent electronically if the individual has indicated a
HEA 1202

5
preference for receiving notices from the bureau electronically,
and the date of the mailing or sending of the notice.
(5) Any requirement that the individual may operate only a motor
vehicle equipped with a certified registered ignition interlock
device.
A driving record may not contain voter registration information.
SECTION 6. IC 9-30-5-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.188-2015,
SECTION 108, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), the court may, in granting specialized driving privileges
under IC 9-30-16-3 or IC 9-30-16-4, also order that the specialized
driving privileges include the requirement that a person may not
operate a motor vehicle unless the vehicle is equipped with a
functioning certified registered ignition interlock device under
IC 9-30-8.
(b) A court may not order the installation of an ignition interlock
device on a vehicle operated by an employee to whom any of the
following apply:
(1) Has been convicted of violating section 1 or 2 of this chapter.
(2) Is employed as the operator of a vehicle owned, leased, or
provided by the employee's employer.
(3) Is subject to a labor agreement that prohibits an employee who
is convicted of an alcohol related offense from operating the
employer's vehicle.
(c) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates a court order
issued under this section commits a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 7. IC 9-30-6-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 88, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in IC 9-30-16-1(g),
whenever a judicial officer has determined that there was probable
cause to believe that a person has violated IC 9-30-5, IC 35-46-9, or
IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal), the clerk of the court shall forward, in a
form and manner prescribed by the bureau:
(1) a paper copy of the affidavit, or an electronic substitute; or
(2) a bureau certificate as described in section 16 of this chapter;
to the bureau at the conclusion of the initial hearing under subsection
(c).
(b) The probable cause affidavit required under section 7(b)(2) of
this chapter must do the following:
(1) Set forth the grounds for the arresting officer's belief that there
was probable cause that the arrested person was operating a
vehicle in violation of IC 9-30-5 or a motorboat in violation of
HEA 1202

6
IC 35-46-9 or IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal).
(2) State that the person was arrested for a violation of IC 9-30-5
or operating a motorboat in violation of IC 35-46-9 or IC 14-15-8
(before its repeal).
(3) State whether the person:
(A) refused to submit to a chemical test when offered; or
(B) submitted to a chemical test that resulted in prima facie
evidence that the person was intoxicated.
(4) Be sworn to by the arresting officer.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), if it is determined under
subsection (a) that there was probable cause to believe that a person
has violated IC 9-30-5, IC 35-46-9, or IC 14-15-8 (before its repeal), at
the initial hearing of the matter held under IC 35-33-7-1 the court shall
recommend immediate suspension of the person's driving privileges to
take effect on the date the order is entered, and forward to the bureau
a copy of the order recommending immediate suspension of driving
privileges.
(d) If it is determined under subsection (a) that there is probable
cause to believe that a person violated IC 9-30-5, the court may, as an
alternative to any suspension of the person's driving privileges under
subsection (c), issue an order recommending that the person be
prohibited from operating a motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle is
equipped with a functioning certified registered ignition interlock
device under IC 9-30-8. This subsection applies even if the probable
cause affidavit in subsection (b) states that the person:
(1) refused to submit to a chemical test; or
(2) submitted to a chemical test that resulted in prima facie
evidence that the person was intoxicated.
The order remains in effect until the bureau is notified by a court that
the criminal charges against the person have been resolved. When the
court issues an order under this subsection, no administrative
suspension is imposed by the bureau and no suspension is noted on the
person's driving record.
(e) A person commits a Class B infraction if the person:
(1) operates a motor vehicle without a functioning certified
registered ignition interlock device; and
(2) is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle unless the motor
vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified registered
ignition interlock device under subsection (d).
(f) A person commits a Class B misdemeanor if the person:
(1) operates a motor vehicle without a functioning certified
registered ignition interlock device; and
HEA 1202

7
(2) knows the person is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle
unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified
registered ignition interlock device under subsection (d).
SECTION 8. IC 9-30-6-8.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2024,
SECTION 46, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. If the bureau receives an order recommending
use of an ignition interlock device under section 8(d) of this chapter,
the bureau shall immediately do the following:
(1) Mail notice to the person's address contained in the records of
the bureau, or send notice electronically if the person has
indicated a preference for receiving notices from the bureau
electronically, stating that the person may not operate a motor
vehicle unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a functioning
certified registered ignition interlock device under IC 9-30-8 and
IC 9-30-8.1 commencing:
(A) five (5) days after the date of the notice; or
(B) on the date the court enters an order recommending use of
an ignition interlock device;
whichever occurs first.
(2) Notify the person of the right to a judicial review under
section 10 of this chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 9-30-8-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.188-2015,
SECTION 112, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) If a court orders the
installation of a certified registered ignition interlock device on a
motor vehicle that a person whose license is restricted owns or expects
to operate, the court shall set the time that the installation must remain
in effect. However, the term may not exceed the maximum term of
imprisonment the court could have imposed. The person shall pay the
cost of installation unless the sentencing court determines that the
person is indigent.
(b) An ignition interlock device ordered installed under this
section must be registered with the Indiana state department of
toxicology and installed in accordance with the manufacturer's
instructions.
SECTION 10. IC 9-30-8-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.23-2020,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Registered ignition interlock devices must
comply with standards and specifications described in
IC 9-30-8.1-2. The director of the state department of toxicology shall
adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish standards and specifications
for a certified ignition interlock device. The standards and
HEA 1202

8
specifications must require at a minimum that the device meets the
following requirements:
(1) Is accurate.
(2) Does not impede the safe operation of a vehicle.
(3) Provides a minimum opportunity to be bypassed.
(4) Shows evidence of tampering if tampering is attempted.
(5) Has a label affixed warning a person that tampering with or
misusing the device is a crime and may subject that person to
criminal and civil penalties.
(6) Provides the ability to accurately identify the user.
(b) After July 1, 2015, all ignition interlock devices used in Indiana
must be certified under rules adopted by the state department of
toxicology.
(c) (b) A vendor or provider may shall submit an application for
approval a registration of an ignition interlock device in a form
prescribed by the director of the state department of toxicology. The
vendor or provider must provide a written attestation under
IC 9-30-8.1-3 that the ignition interlock device complies with the
standards and specifications described in IC 9-30-8.1-2.
(d) If testing is required to determine whether an ignition interlock
device complies with standards set forth by the state department of
toxicology, the testing must be performed by an independent laboratory
designated by the state department of toxicology. The vendor shall pay
any testing expenses under this section.
(e) If the director of the state department of toxicology finds that the
ignition interlock device complies with the standards of the state
department of toxicology, the director may approve the ignition
interlock device as a certified ignition interlock device.
(f) The director of the state department of toxicology shall provide
periodic reports to the criminal justice institute, including, but not
limited to:
(1) the number of ignition interlock devices certified by the state
department of toxicology;
(2) the number of ignition interlock devices currently installed in
Indiana; and
(3) the number of ignition interlock devices rejected by the state
department of toxicology.
(g) The state department of toxicology shall consider all
recommendations made by the criminal justice institute.
(h) (c) The criminal justice institute shall: may
(1) evaluate reports submitted by the state department of
toxicology;
HEA 1202

9
(2) evaluate and study ignition interlock issues. and
(3) make recommendations to the state department of toxicology.
SECTION 11. IC 9-30-8-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.217-2014,
SECTION 132, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A vendor or provider whose
ignition interlock device is certified registered under section 3 of this
chapter shall provide a report to the court that ordered the device or the
court's designee within two (2) weeks if any of the following occur:
(1) Any attempt to start the vehicle with a breath alcohol
concentration of four hundredths (.04) grams or higher if the
person does not register a test result indicating a breath alcohol
concentration of four hundredths (.04) grams or lower within ten
(10) minutes of the initial test.
(2) Absent a documented failure of the ignition interlock device,
failure to take or pass any required test.
(3) Failure of the person ordered to use an ignition interlock
device to appear at the ignition interlock vendor or provider for
maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or
replacement of the ignition interlock device.
(4) Any violations of restrictions imposed by the court.
(b) Any person who is required to have an ignition interlock device
installed as part of probation, a specialized driving permit, or any other
order of a court is required to pay for the installation, leasing,
maintenance, and removal of the ignition interlock device, as well as
any additional expenses ordered by the court or the court's designee.
(c) An ignition interlock vendor or provider shall provide any
reports or data requested by the state department of toxicology.
SECTION 12. IC 9-30-8-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 7. (a) This section applies after June 30, 2017.
(b) The Indiana criminal justice institute shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 concerning the following:
(1) Establishing standards for service centers and inspections.
(2) Establishing standards for ignition interlock device
technicians.
(3) Installation of ignition interlock devices.
(4) Requirements for removing an ignition interlock device.
(5) Fees with respect to service centers and ignition interlock
devices that do not exceed the cost of the program. Fees described
in this subdivision shall be paid by the service center, by the
vendor or provider of an ignition interlock device and used to
defray the expenses of testing, examining, inspecting, and
developing standards concerning service centers or ignition
HEA 1202

10
interlock devices. Funds collected under this subdivision shall be
deposited in the ignition interlock inspection account established
under subsection (c).
(6) Review of denial, suspension, or revocation of certification of
service centers and ignition interlock device installers and
technicians.
(7) Hearing procedures for service centers or installers of ignition
interlock devices.
(8) Appeal procedures for service centers or installers of ignition
interlock devices.
(c) The ignition interlock inspection account is established within
the state general fund to defray the expenses of testing, examining,
inspecting, and developing standards concerning service centers and
ignition interlock devices. The account shall be administered by the
Indiana criminal justice institute. The following provisions apply to the
account:
(1) The account consists of:
(A) fees paid by the vendor or provider of an ignition interlock
device;
(B) fees paid by the service center; and
(C) appropriations made by the general assembly.
(2) Money in the account may be spent to defray the expenses of
testing, examining, inspecting, and developing standards
concerning service centers and ignition interlock devices.
(3) The Indiana criminal justice institute shall annually prepare a
plan for the expenditure of money in the account.
(4) The expenses of administering the account shall be paid from
money in the account.
(5) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the account not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the account in the
same manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the account.
(6) Money in the account at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
SECTION 13. IC 9-30-8-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 8. The bureau and the Indiana criminal justice institute
shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to administer this
chapter and IC 9-30-6-8(d).
SECTION 14. IC 9-30-8.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 8.1. Registration of Ignition Interlock Devices
HEA 1202

11
Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Fail point" means an alcohol concentration of at least
two-hundredths (0.02) gram per one hundred (100) milliliters
of blood or two hundred ten (210) liters of breath or a higher
alcohol concentration prescribed by the originating court.
(2) "Lockout" means a period of time when the ignition
interlock device does not allow a breath sample to be analyzed
or a vehicle's engine to be started.
(3) "Material modification" means an addition or reduction
in features, software version change, configuration profile
change, or alteration in the components, design, or installation
or operating instructions of a registered ignition interlock
device model.
(4) "Random retest" means a breath test required at
randomly variable intervals from the operator of a vehicle
equipped with an ignition interlock device to ensure that the
operator's alcohol concentration remains below the fail point
after vehicle start up.
(5) "Restricted operator" means a person whose driving
privileges are restricted to operating only motor vehicles
equipped with a functioning registered ignition interlock
device.
(6) "Service" means to calibrate, maintain, download data
from, inspect for evidence of tampering or circumvention, and
report information to the appropriate authorities.
(7) "Vendor" means a producer, provider, distributor, or
supplier of an ignition interlock device.
(8) "Violation reset" means activation of a requirement for
service of an ignition interlock device.
Sec. 2. In order to be registered, an ignition interlock device
model must meet or exceed the following standards and
specifications:
(1) The Model Specifications for Breath Alcohol Ignition
Interlock Devices in section III, beginning on page 26862,
published by the National Highway Traffic Safety
Administration in the Federal Register, Volume 78, Number
089, on May 8, 2013, on pages 26849-26867, including:
(A) the General Provisions and Features of Breath Alcohol
Ignition Interlock Devices; and
(B) the Performance Requirements in the Conformance
Tests 1 through 16 when performed under the General
Test Conditions.
HEA 1202

12
(2) Require the operator of a vehicle equipped with the
ignition interlock device to submit to a random retest within
a variable interval ranging from three (3) to fifteen (15)
minutes of starting the vehicle, with random retests
continuing at variable intervals ranging from fifteen (15) to
forty-five (45) minutes after the previous retest for the
duration of the travel.
(3) Have the capability to activate a violation reset with
notification to the vehicle operator when any one (1) of the
following occurs:
(A) There is a circumvention of the correct operation of
the ignition interlock device by the vehicle being started
without a breath test below the fail point having first been
provided.
(B) A breath test result at or above the fail point is
recorded during a vehicle start-up attempt.
(C) A breath test result at or above the fail point is
recorded during a vehicle start-up attempt, and a breath
test result below the fail point is not recorded within ten
(10) minutes after the initial breath test result at or above
the fail point was recorded.
(D) A random retest result at or above the fail point is
recorded.
(E) The vehicle operator fails to provide a breath sample
below the fail point within six (6) minutes of notification of
a required random retest.
(F) The ignition interlock device control head is
disconnected after the vehicle is started.
(G) The ignition interlock device is not serviced by the
vendor or provider within thirty-seven (37) days of
installation or the previous service date.
(4) Have the capability to repeatedly sound the horn of a
vehicle equipped with the ignition interlock device until the
vehicle is turned off when any one (1) of the following occurs:
(A) A violation reset occurs from a missed random retest.
(B) The result of a random retest is at or above the fail
point.
(C) There is a disconnection of the ignition interlock device
control head for longer than one (1) minute after vehicle
start-up.
(5) Activate a lockout after a violation reset if the ignition
interlock device is not serviced by the vendor or provider
HEA 1202

13
within five (5) days of initiation of the violation reset.
(6) Contain an image identification device that:
(A) does not distract or impede the vehicle operator from
safe and legal operation of the vehicle;
(B) produces a digital or photographic image of the vehicle
operator:
(i) upon delivery of a sample required for vehicle
start-up; and
(ii) upon delivery of a sample during a required random
retest;
in various lighting conditions, including, but not limited to,
brightness, darkness, and low light conditions;
(C) documents the date and time of a digital or
photographic image produced; and
(D) stores the digital or photographic images and data
produced in the device memory for download by the
vendor or provider.
(7) Have a label affixed warning a person that tampering with
or misusing the device is a crime and may subject that person
to criminal and civil penalties.
Sec. 3. The registration form required in IC 9-30-8-3 shall
include:
(1) the vendor or provider's name, address, telephone
number, and electronic mail address;
(2) the name, telephone number, and electronic mail address
of a contact person authorized to represent the vendor or
provider;
(3) the name and number of the ignition interlock device
model for which registration is sought;
(4) a list of other states in which the same ignition interlock
device model has been approved for use;
(5) a precise set of specifications describing the features of the
ignition interlock device model;
(6) the operator's manual, user's guide, or instructions
provided to restricted operators using the ignition interlock
device model;
(7) a written attestation that the ignition interlock device
meets the registration standards and specifications described
in section 2 of this chapter; and
(8) an agreement to provide, upon the request by the state
department of toxicology, a report from an independent
accredited laboratory showing that the device meets the
HEA 1202

14
required standards and specifications, and a copy of the
accreditation of each laboratory.
Sec. 4. (a) Upon receipt of the information described in section
3 of this chapter, the ignition interlock device shall be deemed
registered for a period of three years unless it is surrendered,
suspended, or revoked prior to expiration.
(b) To renew a registration of an ignition interlock device
model, the vendor or provider must submit the information
required under section 3 of this chapter to the state department of
toxicology.
Sec. 5. During the registration period of a registered ignition
interlock device model, the vendor or provider of the device must
provide written notice to the state department of toxicology of a
material modification of the registered ignition interlock device
model prior to implementation of the material modification in
Indiana and submit a written attestation described in section 3(7)
of this chapter.
Sec. 6. (a) The registration of an ignition interlock device model
may be reviewed by the state department of toxicology during the
course of the registration period.
(b) The director of the state department of toxicology may deny
a registration or renewal of a registration of an ignition interlock
device model and may suspend or revoke a registration of an
ignition interlock device model upon receiving evidence that the
ignition interlock device model does not comply with a requirement
of this chapter.
(c) An order denying a registration of an ignition interlock
device model under this section shall be issued by the director of
the state department of toxicology following the requirements of
IC 4-21.5-3-5.
(d) If a petition for review of an order issued under subsection
(c) is subsequently granted under IC 4-21.5-3-7, the resulting
administrative proceeding shall be conducted by the state
department of toxicology.
(e) An order suspending or revoking a registration of an ignition
interlock device model shall be issued by the director of the state
department of toxicology in accordance with IC 4-21.5-3-6.
SECTION 15. IC 9-30-9-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) If the court enters
an order conditionally deferring charges under section 3 of this chapter,
the court may do the following:
(1) Suspend the person's driving privileges for at least two (2)
HEA 1202

15
years but not more than four (4) years.
(2) Impose other appropriate conditions, including the payment of
fees imposed under section 8 of this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding IC 9-30-6-9, the defendant may be granted
probationary driving privileges only after the defendant's license has
been suspended for at least one (1) year.
(c) The court may, as an alternative to a license suspension under
subsection (a)(1), issue an order prohibiting the defendant from
operating a motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a
functioning certified registered ignition interlock device under
IC 9-30-8 and IC 9-30-8.1. An order requiring an ignition interlock
device must remain in effect for at least two (2) years but not more than
four (4) years.
SECTION 16. IC 9-30-9-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) If the court refers
a defendant to the program under section 6 of this chapter, the court
may do the following:
(1) Suspend the defendant's driving privileges for at least ninety
(90) days but not more than four (4) years.
(2) Impose other appropriate conditions.
(b) The defendant may be granted probationary driving privileges
only after the defendant's license has been suspended for at least thirty
(30) days under IC 9-30-6-9.
(c) The court may, as an alternative to a license suspension under
subsection (a)(1), issue an order prohibiting the defendant from
operating a motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a
functioning certified registered ignition interlock device under
IC 9-30-8 and IC 9-30-8.1. An order requiring an ignition interlock
device must remain in effect for at least two (2) years but not more than
four (4) years.
SECTION 17. IC 9-30-9-7.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2005,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. (a) A person commits a Class B infraction if
the person:
(1) operates a motor vehicle without a functioning certified
registered ignition interlock device; and
(2) is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle unless the motor
vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified registered
ignition interlock device under section 5(c) or 7(c) of this chapter.
(b) A person commits a Class B misdemeanor if the person:
(1) operates a motor vehicle without a functioning certified
registered ignition interlock device; and
HEA 1202

16
(2) knows the person is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle
unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified
registered ignition interlock device under section 5(c) or 7(c) of
this chapter.
SECTION 18. IC 10-21-1-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.150-2023,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) Each school corporation shall designate at
least one (1) individual who is not a school resource officer as
described in IC 20-26-18.2-2 to serve as the school safety specialist for
the school corporation.
(b) Each charter school shall designate at least one (1) individual
who is not a school resource officer as described in IC 20-26-18.2-2 to
serve as the school safety specialist for the charter school. A charter
school in operation on July 1, 2023, shall comply with this subsection
on or before July 1, 2024.
(c) All school safety specialists shall be chosen by the
superintendent of the school corporation or leadership of the charter
school with the approval of the governing body or organizer.
(d) A school safety specialist shall perform the following duties:
(1) Serve on the county school safety commission with
jurisdiction over the school corporation if that individual school
safety specialist is chosen by the superintendent of the school
corporation with the approval of the governing body. Except as
provided in section 12 of this chapter, the school safety specialists
of charter schools do not serve on a county school safety
commission.
(2) Participate each year in a number of days of school safety
training that the department of education office of school safety
determines necessary under section 13 of this chapter.
(3) With the assistance of the county school safety commission
with jurisdiction over the school corporation or charter school,
develop, implement, and improve a school safety plan for each
school building in the school corporation or charter school.
(4) Coordinate the school safety plans of each school building in
the school corporation or charter school as required under this
chapter and under rules adopted by the Indiana state board of
education.
(5) Act as a resource for the school corporation's or charter
school's safe school committees and other individuals in the
school corporation or charter school on issues related to school
discipline, safety, and security.
(6) Serve as a liaison for the school corporation or charter school
HEA 1202

17
regarding school safety matters with the board, the department of
homeland security, the department of education, the Indiana
criminal justice institute, and other state agencies, as applicable.
SECTION 19. IC 11-11-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 81, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The facilities of the department must
comply with federal and state health, sanitation, safety, and fire laws
applicable to dwellings, food establishments, eating facilities, and
public buildings.
(b) Each department facility shall be inspected: at least annually by:
(1) at least annually by the Indiana department of health if the
facility is not accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting
organization; and
(2) by the state fire marshal department of homeland security
in accordance with IC 22-14-2-11;
who shall, within fifteen (15) days of the inspection, file a written
report with the commissioner listing all unsafe, unsanitary, or
unhealthy conditions within a facility that constitute a menace to the
health, safety, and welfare of committed persons or department
employees. In determining whether conditions are unsafe, unsanitary,
or unhealthy, the Indiana department of health and the state fire
marshal department of homeland security shall consider the degree
of overcrowding, the light, air, and space available to offenders within
a facility, the size and arrangement of rooms and cells, the sanitary
facilities, and the extent to which conditions in a facility endanger life
or property.
(c) The commissioner shall correct all unsafe, unsanitary, or
unhealthy conditions reported by the Indiana department of health or
the state fire marshal department of homeland security with
reasonable promptness. Failure by the department to initiate and
continue action to correct unsafe, unsanitary, or unhealthy conditions
within thirty (30) days of receiving a report of those conditions from
the Indiana department of health or the state fire marshal department
of homeland security constitutes noncompliance with this subsection.
Upon such noncompliance, the commissioner shall submit to the
reporting agency and the governor a written statement explaining:
(1) why the reported condition or conditions have not been
remedied;
(2) what the estimated cost of remedying the reported condition
or conditions would be in terms of construction, renovation,
manpower, space, and equipment;
(3) whether the reported condition or conditions can be corrected
HEA 1202

18
by using facilities of other governmental entities;
(4) whether additional state financing is required and, if so, the
estimated amount needed; and
(5) the probable consequences of not remedying each reported
unsafe, unsanitary, or unhealthy condition.
(d) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the Indiana
department of health and state fire marshal department of homeland
security retain authority to correct unhealthy, unsanitary, or unsafe
conditions within a facility as provided by law.
SECTION 20. IC 12-17.2-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.26-2025,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A license may be issued only if a child care
center is in compliance with food, health, safety, and sanitation
standards as determined by the division under rules adopted by the
division under IC 12-17.2-2-4 or in accordance with a variance or
waiver approved by the division under IC 12-17.2-2-10.
(b) A license may be issued only if the child care center is in
substantial compliance with the fire and life safety rules as determined
by the state fire marshal under rules adopted by the division under
IC 12-17.2-2-4 or in accordance with a variance or waiver approved by
the division under IC 12-17.2-2-10.
(c) The division may issue a waiver or variance regarding a
determination by the division or the state fire marshal under
subsections (a) and (b).
(b) Prior to the division issuing an initial license to an applicant,
the child care center must be inspected and found to be in
substantial compliance with applicable building and fire safety
laws by the department of homeland security.
(c) Upon receipt of the initial application for a license:
(1) the division shall notify the department of homeland
security of the application; and
(2) the department of homeland security shall inspect the
child care center.
(d) At least one (1) adult individual who maintains current
certification in a course of pediatric cardiopulmonary resuscitation
applicable to all age groups of children cared for by the child care
center shall be present at all times when a child is in the care of a child
care center. Certifications accepted under this subsection must include
a live return demonstration of skills.
(e) An individual who is employed or volunteers as a caregiver at a
child care center:
(1) must, not more than ninety (90) days after the individual
HEA 1202

19
begins employment or volunteer duties, be trained in pediatric
cardiopulmonary resuscitation applicable to all age groups of
children cared for by the child care center; and
(2) shall maintain current certification in pediatric first aid
applicable to all age groups of children cared for by the child care
center.
SECTION 21. IC 12-17.2-4-14 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) The division
may grant a probationary license to a licensee who is temporarily
unable to comply with a rule if:
(1) the noncompliance does not present an immediate threat to the
health and well-being of the children;
(2) the licensee files a plan with the division or the state fire
marshal to correct the areas of noncompliance within the
probationary period; and
(3) the division or state fire marshal approves the plan.
(b) A probationary license is valid for not more than six (6) months.
The division may extend a probationary license for one (1) additional
period of six (6) months.
(c) An existing license is invalidated when a probationary license is
issued.
(d) At the expiration of the probationary license, the division shall
reinstate the original license to the end of the original term of the
license, issue a new license, or revoke the license.
(e) Upon receipt of a probationary license, the licensee shall return
to the division the previously issued license.
(f) The division shall:
(1) upon issuing a probationary license under this section, provide
written notice to the licensee that the division will provide the
notice required under subdivision (2); and
(2) not more than seven (7) days after issuing a probationary
license under this section, publish notice under IC 5-3-1 and
provide written notice to the parent or guardian of each child
enrolled in the child care center of the:
(A) issuance of the probationary license; and
(B) reason for the issuance of the probationary license.
SECTION 22. IC 12-17.2-4-15 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The division
and the state fire marshal shall do the following:
(1) Make annual onsite inspections.
(2) Keep written records of their the monitoring activities and
inspections.
HEA 1202

20
(b) The department of homeland security shall perform
inspections of child care centers in accordance with IC 22-14-2-11.
SECTION 23. IC 12-17.2-4-16 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. The licensee shall
cooperate with the division and the state fire marshal in carrying out
these activities, including permitting the division and the state fire
marshal department of homeland security to conduct announced or
unannounced inspections.
SECTION 24. IC 12-17.2-4-32, AS AMENDED BY P.L.121-2020,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 32. (a) The following constitute sufficient grounds
for revocation of a license:
(1) A determination by the department of child services of child
abuse or neglect (as defined in IC 31-9-2-14) by:
(A) the licensee;
(B) an employee of the licensee who may be present on the
premises of the child care center during operating hours of the
child care center; or
(C) a volunteer of the licensee who may be present on the
premises of the child care center during operating hours of the
child care center.
(2) A criminal conviction of the licensee, or an employee or
volunteer of the licensee who may be present on the premises of
the child care center during operating hours of the child care
center, of any of the following:
(A) A felony:
(i) related to the health or safety of a child;
(ii) that is a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2);
(iii) that is a dangerous felony; or
(iv) that is not a felony otherwise described in items (i)
through (iii), and less than ten (10) years have elapsed from
the date the person was discharged from probation,
imprisonment, or parole, whichever discharge date is latest.
(B) A misdemeanor related to the health or safety of a child.
(C) A misdemeanor for operating a child care center without
a license under section 35 of this chapter, or a substantially
similar offense in another jurisdiction if the offense is directly
or indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or safety of a
child.
(D) A misdemeanor for operating a child care home without a
license under IC 12-17.2-5-35, or a substantially similar
offense in another jurisdiction if the offense is directly or
HEA 1202

21
indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or safety of a child.
(3) A determination by the division that the licensee made false
statements in the licensee's application for licensure.
(4) A determination by the division that the licensee made false
statements in the records required by the division.
(5) A determination by the division that the licensee previously
operated a:
(A) child care center without a license under this chapter; or
(B) child care home without a license under IC 12-17.2-5.
(6) A determination by the division that the operator of the
child care center has failed to comply with an order of the
department of homeland security.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(2), if:
(1) a license is revoked due to a criminal conviction of an
employee or a volunteer of the licensee; and
(2) the division determines that the employee or volunteer has
been dismissed by the licensee;
the criminal conviction of the former employee or former volunteer
does not require revocation of a license.
SECTION 25. IC 12-17.2-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 45, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) An unlicensed child care ministry under
section 1 of this chapter may not operate unless the child care ministry:
(1) has registered with and met the requirements of the division;
and the department of homeland security.
(2) for an initial registration only, has been inspected and
found to be in substantial compliance with applicable building
and fire safety laws by the department of homeland security.
Registration application forms shall be provided by the division. and
the department of homeland security.
(b) A registration application under this section must include a
current and valid electronic mail address for the applicant.
(c) Registration under this section expires two (2) years after the
date of issuance unless revoked, modified to a probationary or
suspended status, or voluntarily returned.
(d) Upon receipt of an initial registration:
(1) the division shall notify the department of homeland
security of the filing; and
(2) the department of homeland security shall inspect the
unlicensed child care ministry.
SECTION 26. IC 12-17.2-6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 46, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HEA 1202

22
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) As used in this section, "primary use of the
building" means the occupancy classification that is:
(1) most closely related to the intended use of the building; and
(2) determined by the rules of the fire prevention and building
safety commission in effect at the time that the child care ministry
is first registered.
(b) The state fire marshal department of homeland security shall
inspect a child care ministry registered under section 2 of this chapter
to ensure that the child care ministry complies with the requirements
of subsection (c).
(c) Except as provided in the following, a registered child care
ministry shall comply with all rules of the fire prevention and building
safety commission applicable to the primary use of the building:
(1) A registered child care ministry with an occupant load of at
least fifty (50) shall do either of the following:
(A) Install and maintain a fire alarm system in compliance
with the rules of the fire prevention and building safety
commission.
(B) Provide a notice on a form prescribed by the department
of homeland security to the parents of each child who attends
the ministry stating that the ministry does not have the same
level of fire safety protection as a licensed child care center.
(2) Each registered child care ministry with an occupant load of
less than fifty (50) shall do either of the following:
(A) Install and maintain in good operating condition at least
one (1) battery operated smoke detector in each room and
corridor used by the ministry.
(B) Provide a notice on a form prescribed by the department
of homeland security to the parents of each child who attends
the ministry stating that the ministry does not have the same
level of fire safety protection as a licensed child care center.
(3) Each registered child care ministry shall comply with the rules
of the fire prevention and building safety commission concerning
fire drills.
For purposes of this subsection, occupant load is determined by
dividing the total square footage of the area used by the child care
ministry by thirty-five (35) and rounding any result that is not a whole
number up to the next whole number.
(d) The state fire marshal department of homeland security shall
make an inspection perform inspections of a child care ministry
registered under section 2 of this chapter at least annually. in
accordance with IC 22-14-2-11.
HEA 1202

23
(e) During an inspection, the state fire marshal shall inspect the
structure in which the child care ministry is conducted for fire safety
and life safety with respect to the structure's primary use.
SECTION 27. IC 12-17.2-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 47, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Upon the completion of the inspections
required under this chapter, a notice signed by the inspectors inspector
from the division and the department of homeland security shall be
issued to the operator of each child care ministry found to be in
compliance. The notice shall be placed in a conspicuous place in the
child care ministry, and must be in substantially the following form:
"THIS UNLICENSED REGISTERED CHILD CARE MINISTRY
has been inspected and complies with state rules concerning
health and sanitation in child care ministries.
DATE ________________________
SIGNATURE ________________________
DIVISION OF FAMILY RESOURCES".
THIS UNLICENSED REGISTERED CHILD CARE MINISTRY
has been inspected and complies with state law concerning fire
safety and life safety.
DATE ________________________
SIGNATURE ________________________
DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY".
(b) Upon completion of an inspection by the department of
homeland security, a copy of the inspection findings shall be issued
to the unlicensed child care ministry. The operator of the
unlicensed child care ministry shall maintain a copy of the most
recent inspection findings in a conspicuous place in the unlicensed
child care ministry.
SECTION 28. IC 12-17.2-6-13 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 13. (a) The state fire marshal shall charge a child care
ministry a fifty dollar ($50) fee for processing a registration under
section 2 of this chapter.
(b) The state fire marshal shall deposit the fees collected under
subsection (a) in the fire and building services fund established by
IC 22-12-6-1.
SECTION 29. IC 12-17.2-6-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.121-2020,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) The following constitute sufficient grounds
for revocation of a registration under this chapter:
(1) A determination by the department of child services of child
abuse or neglect (as defined in IC 31-9-2-14) by:
HEA 1202

24
(A) the operator of the child care ministry;
(B) an employee of the child care ministry who may be present
on the premises of the child care ministry during operating
hours of the child care ministry; or
(C) a volunteer of the child care ministry who may be present
on the premises of the child care ministry during operating
hours of the child care ministry.
(2) A criminal conviction of the operator of the child care
ministry, or an employee or volunteer of the child care ministry
who may be present on the premises of the child care ministry
during operating hours of the child care ministry, of any of the
following:
(A) A felony:
(i) related to the health or safety of a child;
(ii) that is a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2);
(iii) that is a dangerous felony; or
(iv) that is not a felony otherwise described in items (i)
through (iii), and less than ten (10) years have elapsed from
the date the person was discharged from probation,
imprisonment, or parole, whichever discharge date is latest.
(B) A misdemeanor related to the health or safety of a child.
(C) A misdemeanor for operating a child care ministry without
a registration under this chapter, or a substantially similar
offense in another jurisdiction if the offense is directly or
indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or safety of a child.
(D) A misdemeanor for operating a child care center without
a license under IC 12-17.2-4-35, or a substantially similar
offense in another jurisdiction if the offense is directly or
indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or safety of a child.
(E) A misdemeanor for operating a child care home without a
license under IC 12-17.2-5-35, or a substantially similar
offense in another jurisdiction if the offense is directly or
indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or safety of a child.
(3) A determination by the division that the operator of the child
care ministry made false statements in the child care ministry's
registration application.
(4) A determination by the division that the operator of the child
care ministry made false statements in the records required by the
division.
(5) A determination by the division that the operator of the child
care ministry previously operated a:
(A) child care ministry without a registration under this
HEA 1202

25
chapter;
(B) child care center without a license under IC 12-17.2-4; or
(C) child care home without a license under IC 12-17.2-5.
(6) A determination by the division that the operator of the
child care ministry has failed to comply with an order of the
department of homeland security.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(2), if:
(1) a registration is revoked due to a criminal conviction of an
employee or a volunteer of the child care ministry; and
(2) the division determines that the employee or volunteer has
been dismissed by the child care ministry;
the criminal conviction of the former employee or former volunteer
does not require revocation of the registration.
SECTION 30. IC 12-23-5-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Subject to
subsection (b), if a court enters an order conditionally deferring charges
that involve a violation of IC 9-30-5, the court shall do the following:
(1) Suspend the defendant's driving privileges for at least ninety
(90) days but not more than two (2) years.
(2) Impose other appropriate conditions.
(b) A defendant may be granted probationary driving privileges only
after the defendant's license has been suspended for at least thirty (30)
days under IC 9-30-6-9.
(c) If a defendant has at least one (1) conviction for an offense under
IC 9-30-5, the order granting probationary driving privileges under
subsection (b) must, in a county that provides for the installation of an
a registered ignition interlock device under IC 9-30-8 and
IC 9-30-8.1, prohibit the defendant from operating a motor vehicle
unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified
registered ignition interlock device under IC 9-30-8 and IC 9-30-8.1.
(d) If a defendant does not have a prior conviction for an offense
under IC 9-30-5, the court may, as an alternative to a license
suspension under subsection (a)(1), issue an order prohibiting the
defendant from operating a motor vehicle unless the motor vehicle is
equipped with a functioning certified registered ignition interlock
device under IC 9-30-8 and IC 9-30-8.1. An order requiring an a
registered ignition interlock device must remain in effect for at least
two (2) years but not more than four (4) years.
SECTION 31. IC 12-23-5-5.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) A person
commits a Class B infraction if the person:
(1) operates a motor vehicle without a functioning certified
HEA 1202

26
registered ignition interlock device; and
(2) is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle unless the motor
vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified registered
ignition interlock device under section 5(d) of this chapter.
(b) A person commits a Class B misdemeanor if the person:
(1) operates a motor vehicle without a functioning certified
registered ignition interlock device; and
(2) knows the person is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle
unless the motor vehicle is equipped with a functioning certified
registered ignition interlock device under section 5(d) of this
chapter.
SECTION 32. IC 16-28-1-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) Licensure inspections of health facilities
shall be made regularly in accordance with rules adopted under this
chapter. The division shall make all health and sanitation inspections.
The department of homeland security shall make all fire safety
inspections in accordance with IC 22-14-2-11.
(b) The exact date of an inspection of a health facility under this
chapter may not be announced or communicated directly or indirectly
to the owner, administrator, or an employee of the facility before the
inspection. An employee of the state department who knowingly or
intentionally informs a health facility of the exact date of an inspection
shall be suspended without pay for five (5) days for a first offense and
shall be dismissed for a subsequent offense.
(c) Reports of all inspections must be:
(1) in writing; and
(2) sent to the health facility.
(d) The report of an inspection and records relating to the inspection
may not be released to the public until the conditions set forth in
IC 16-19-3-25 are satisfied.
SECTION 33. IC 16-31-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.139-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The commission shall establish standards for
persons required to be certified or licensed by the commission to
provide emergency medical services. To be certified or licensed, a
person must meet the following minimum requirements:
(1) The personnel certified or licensed under this chapter must do
the following:
(A) Meet the standards for education and training established
by the commission by rule.
(B) Successfully complete a basic or an inservice course of
HEA 1202

27
education and training on sudden infant death syndrome that
is certified by the commission in conjunction with the state
health commissioner.
(C) Successfully complete a basic or an inservice course of
education and training on autism that is certified by the
commission.
(D) Successfully complete a research based training program
concerning suicide assessment, treatment, and management
that is:
(i) demonstrated to be an effective or promising program;
and
(ii) recommended by the Indiana Suicide Prevention
Network Advisory Council.
(E) After December 31, 2024, complete basic training, which
may be completed online or by other means of virtual
instruction, that addresses the mental health and wellness of
persons required to be licensed under this chapter, including:
(i) healthy coping skills to preserve the mental health of
persons required to be licensed under this chapter and
manage the stress and trauma related to the provision of
emergency medical services;
(ii) recognition of symptoms of posttraumatic stress disorder
and signs of suicidal behavior; and
(iii) information on mental health resources available for
persons required to be licensed under this chapter.
(F) Submit to a national criminal history background
check. The state police department shall release the results
of the national criminal history background check
conducted under this clause to the:
(i) commission; or
(ii) department of homeland security.
(2) Ambulances to be used must conform with the requirements
of the commission and must either be:
(A) covered by insurance issued by a company licensed to do
business in Indiana in the amounts and under the terms
required in rules adopted by the commission; or
(B) owned by a governmental entity covered under IC 34-13-3.
(3) Emergency ambulance service shall be provided in accordance
with rules adopted by the commission. However, the rules
adopted under this chapter may not prohibit the dispatch of an
ambulance to aid an emergency patient because an emergency
medical technician is not immediately available to staff the
HEA 1202

28
ambulance.
(4) Ambulances must be equipped with a system of emergency
medical communications approved by the commission. The
emergency medical communication system must properly
integrate and coordinate appropriate local and state emergency
communications systems and reasonably available area
emergency medical facilities with the general public's need for
emergency medical services.
(5) Emergency medical communications shall be provided in
accordance with rules adopted by the commission.
(6) A nontransporting emergency medical services vehicle must
conform with the commission's requirements.
SECTION 34. IC 22-11-14-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 64, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) A retailer may sell consumer fireworks
and items referenced in section 8(a) of this chapter from a tent under
the following conditions:
(1) The tent may not be larger than one thousand five hundred
(1,500) square feet.
(2) There may be only one (1) tent for each registration granted
under section 11(a) of this chapter.
(3) The tent may not be located closer than one hundred (100) feet
from a permanent structure.
(4) A vehicle may not be parked closer than twenty (20) feet from
the edge of the tent.
(5) The tent must be fire retardant.
(6) The sales site must comply with all applicable local zoning
and land use rules.
(7) Sales of fireworks may be made from the tent for not more
than forty-five (45) days in a year.
(8) The weight of consumer fireworks in a tent may not exceed
three thousand (3,000) gross pounds of consumer fireworks.
(9) A retailer that legally operated a tent with a registration in
2005 may continue operation in a tent in 2006 and the following
years. A registration under section 11(a) of this chapter is
required for operation in 2006 and following years. For purposes
of this subdivision, a retailer includes a resident wholesaler who
supplied consumer fireworks to an applicant for a tent registration
in 2005.
(10) The retailer holds a valid registration under section 11(a) of
this chapter.
(b) A retailer may sell consumer fireworks and items referenced in
HEA 1202

29
section 8(a) of this chapter from a Class 1 structure (as defined in
IC 22-12-1-4) if the Class 1 structure meets the requirements of any of
the following subdivisions:
(1) The structure complied with the rules for a B-2 or M building
occupancy classification before July 4, 2003, under the Indiana
building code adopted by the fire prevention and building safety
commission established under IC 22-12-2-1:
(A) in which consumer fireworks were sold or stored on or
before July 4, 2003; and
(B) in which no subsequent intervening nonfireworks sales or
storage use has occurred.
(2) The structure complied with the rules for a B-2 or M building
occupancy classification before July 4, 2003, under the Indiana
building code adopted by the fire prevention and building safety
commission established under IC 22-12-2-1;
(A) in which consumer fireworks were sold or stored on or
before July 4, 2003;
(B) in a location at which the retailer was registered as a
resident wholesaler in 2005; and
(C) in which the retailer's primary business is not the sale of
consumer fireworks.
(3) The structure complies with the rules for an H-3 building
occupancy classification under the Indiana building code adopted
by the fire prevention and building safety commission established
under IC 22-12-2-1, or the equivalent occupancy classification
adopted by subsequent rules of the fire prevention and building
safety commission.
(4) The structure complies with the rules adopted after July 3,
2003, by the fire prevention and building safety commission
established under IC 22-12-2-1 for an M building occupancy
classification under the Indiana building code.
A registration under section 11(a) of this chapter is required for
operation in 2006 and following years.
(c) This subsection does not apply to a structure identified in
subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), (b)(3), or (b)(4). A retailer may sell consumer
fireworks and items referenced in section 8(a) of this chapter from a
structure under the following conditions:
(1) The structure must be a Class 1 structure in which consumer
fireworks are sold and stored.
(2) The sales site must comply with all applicable local zoning
and land use rules.
(3) The weight of consumer fireworks in the structure may not
HEA 1202

30
exceed three thousand (3,000) gross pounds of consumer
fireworks.
(4) The retailer holds a valid registration under section 11(a) of
this chapter.
(5) A retailer that sold consumer fireworks and operated from a
structure with a registration in 2005 may continue in operation in
the structure in 2006 and the following years. A registration under
section 11(a) of this chapter is required for operation in 2006 and
following years.
(d) The state fire marshal or a A member of the department of
homeland security staff shall, under section 9 of this chapter, inspect
tents and structures in which fireworks are sold in accordance with
IC 22-14-2-11. The state fire marshal department of homeland
security may delegate this responsibility to a responding fire
department with jurisdiction over the tent or structure, subject to the
policies and procedures of the state fire marshal.
(e) A retailer shall file an application for each retail location on a
form to be provided by the state fire marshal. department of
homeland security.
(f) This chapter does not limit the quantity of items referenced in
section 8(a) of this chapter that may be sold from any Class 1 structure
that complied with the rules of the fire prevention and building safety
commission in effect before May 21, 2003.
SECTION 35. IC 22-11-18-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The state fire
marshal's office department of homeland security shall, as part of its
normal inspection process, conduct inspections of hotels and motels in
accordance with IC 22-14-2-11, to determine if the detectors are
installed and functioning in compliance with this chapter.
(b) Except for common areas shared by at least three (3) dwellings,
a dwelling may not be inspected solely to determine compliance with
section 3.5 of this chapter unless the owner or occupant of the dwelling
gives permission.
(c) Any evidence of a violation of this chapter shall be turned over
to the prosecuting attorney of the county where the violation occurred.
SECTION 36. IC 22-14-2-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 88, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. The department shall carry out a program to
periodically inspect structures and other property. that are used by the
state, a county, a city, a town, or a school corporation, including
institutions where inmates are involuntarily detained. Inspections shall
be conducted under the schedule specified by the department. The
HEA 1202

31
department may exclude a class of buildings or other property from
inspection under this section, if the department determines that the
public interest will be served without inspection. Such inspections
shall be conducted at a frequency specified by the department. The
department may exclude a class of buildings or other property
from inspection under this section, if the department determines:
(1) that the building or property is subject to inspection for
compliance with statewide fire or building safety laws by
another entity; or
(2) that the public interest will be served without inspection.
SECTION 37. IC 22-14-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 90, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsections (c) and
(d), this chapter does not apply to a nonpublic school (as defined in
IC 20-18-2-12) or a school operated by a school corporation (as defined
in IC 20-18-2-16).
(b) The department shall carry out an inspection program to
periodically inspect regulated places of amusement or entertainment
These inspections shall be conducted at least annually. in accordance
with IC 22-14-2-11.
(c) A school that holds amusement or entertainment events shall be
inspected at least one (1) time each year. in accordance with
IC 22-14-2-11. The inspection may be performed by either the
department or the fire department that has jurisdiction over the school.
(d) At the time of each annual inspection performed by the
department, the department shall provide a fire safety checklist to each
school that holds amusement or entertainment events. Each school
shall be responsible for ensuring compliance with the items on the fire
safety checklist for each amusement or entertainment event held at the
school.
SECTION 38. IC 31-27-2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 223, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The department shall adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 concerning the licensing and inspection of:
(1) child caring institutions, foster family homes, group homes,
and child placing agencies after consultation with the
(A) Indiana department of health; and
(B) fire prevention and building safety commission; and
(2) child caring institutions and group homes that are licensed for
infants and toddlers after consultation with the division of family
resources.
(b) The rules adopted under subsection (a) shall be applied by the
HEA 1202

32
department and state fire marshal in the licensing and inspection of
applicants for a license and licensees under this article.
(c) The rules adopted under IC 4-22-2 must establish minimum
standards for the care and treatment of children in a secure private
facility.
(d) The rules described in subsection (c) must include standards
governing the following:
(1) Admission criteria.
(2) General physical and environmental conditions.
(3) Services and programs to be provided to confined children.
(4) Procedures for ongoing monitoring and discharge planning.
(5) Procedures for the care and control of confined persons that
are necessary to ensure the health, safety, and treatment of
confined children.
(e) The department shall license a facility as a secure private facility
if the facility:
(1) meets the minimum standards required under subsection (c);
(2) provides a continuum of care and services; and
(3) is licensed under IC 31-27-3.
(f) A waiver of the rules may not be granted for treatment and
reporting requirements.
(g) Rules that the fire prevention and building safety
commission adopts under IC 22-13-2-2:
(1) establish the minimum building and fire safety
requirements applicable to structures covered by this article;
and
(2) take precedence over conflicting rules as provided for in
IC 22-13-2-3.
(h) The department may not adopt rules regulating the same
subject matter as rules adopted by the fire prevention and building
safety commission.
SECTION 39. IC 31-27-3-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 273, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A license may be issued only
if the child caring institution is in substantial compliance with food,
health, safety, and sanitation standards under rules adopted by the
department under IC 31-27-2-4 or in accordance with a variance or
waiver approved by the department under IC 31-27-2-8.
(b) A license may be issued only if the child caring institution is in
compliance with the fire and life safety rules as determined by the state
fire marshal under rules adopted by the department under IC 31-27-2-4
or in accordance with a variance or waiver approved by the department
HEA 1202

33
under IC 31-27-2-8.
(c) The department may issue a waiver or variance regarding a
determination by the state fire marshal under subsection (b).
(b) Prior to the department issuing an initial license to an
applicant, the child caring institution must be inspected and found
to be in substantial compliance with applicable building and fire
safety laws by the department of homeland security.
(c) Upon receipt of the initial application for a license:
(1) the department shall notify the department of homeland
security of the application; and
(2) the department of homeland security shall inspect the
child caring institution.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e), the department may not
issue a license under this chapter unless the child caring institution is
staffed by, when children are being cared for, at least one (1) child care
provider who is annually certified in a program on pediatric
cardiopulmonary resuscitation and pediatric airway obstruction under
the American Heart Association's Basic Life Support Course D or any
other comparable course approved by the department.
(e) The requirement under subsection (d) does not apply to a child
caring institution that only serves children who are at least thirteen (13)
years of age and less than twenty-one (21) years of age. However, a
child caring institution that only serves children who are at least
thirteen (13) years of age and less than twenty-one (21) years of age
must have on duty, when children are being cared for, at least one (1)
child care provider who is annually certified in a program on
cardiopulmonary resuscitation as required by the department.
SECTION 40. IC 31-27-3-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 273, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The department and the
state fire marshal shall do the following:
(1) Make annual onsite inspections.
(2) Keep written records of their the monitoring activities and
inspections.
(b) The department of homeland security shall perform periodic
inspections of child caring institutions.
SECTION 41. IC 31-27-3-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.128-2012,
SECTION 100, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. A licensee shall cooperate with
the department the state fire marshal, and any other state agency
working on behalf of the department in carrying out the activities
required by section 15 of this chapter, including permitting the
HEA 1202

34
department, the state fire marshal, department of homeland security,
and any other state agency working on behalf of the department to
conduct announced or unannounced inspections.
SECTION 42. IC 31-27-3-31, AS AMENDED BY P.L.243-2019,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 31. (a) The following constitute sufficient grounds
for revocation of a license:
(1) A determination by the department of child abuse or neglect
by:
(A) the licensee; or
(B) an employee, volunteer, or contractor of the licensee.
(2) A criminal conviction of the licensee, or the director or
manager of a facility where children will be placed by the
licensee, of any of the following:
(A) A felony.
(B) A misdemeanor related to the health or safety of a child.
(C) A misdemeanor for operating a child caring institution,
foster family home, group home, or child placing agency
without a license under this article (or IC 12-17.4 before its
repeal).
(D) A misdemeanor for operating a child care center or child
care home without a license under IC 12-17.2.
(3) A determination by the department that the licensee made
false statements in the licensee's application for licensure.
(4) A determination by the department that the licensee made
false statements in the records required by the department.
(5) A determination by the department that:
(A) the licensee; or
(B) an employee, volunteer, or contractor of the licensee;
previously operated a home or facility without a license required
under any applicable provision of this article (or IC 12-17.4
before its repeal) or IC 12-17.2.
(6) A juvenile adjudication of a licensee for a nonwaivable
offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 that, if committed by an
adult, would be a felony.
(7) A determination by the department that the operator of
the child caring institution has failed to comply with an order
of the department of homeland security.
(b) A license may also be revoked if an employee, volunteer, or
contractor of the licensee has had any of the following:
(1) A conviction of a nonwaivable offense, as defined in
IC 31-9-2-84.8.
HEA 1202

35
(2) A conviction of any other felony or a misdemeanor relating to
the health and safety of a child, unless the licensee is granted a
waiver by the department with regard to the employee, volunteer,
or contractor.
(3) A juvenile adjudication for a nonwaivable offense, as defined
in IC 31-9-2-84.8 that, if committed by an adult, would be a
felony, unless the licensee is granted a waiver by the department
with regard to the employee, volunteer, or contractor.
(c) In determining whether to grant a waiver under subsection (b),
the department shall consider the following factors:
(1) The length of time that has passed since the disqualifying
conviction.
(2) The severity, nature, and circumstances of the offense.
(3) Evidence of rehabilitation.
(4) The duties and qualifications required for the proposed
employment positions, volunteer assignment, or contract.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a) or (b), if:
(1) a license could be revoked due to a criminal conviction of, or
a determination of child abuse or neglect by, an employee,
volunteer, or contractor of the licensee; and
(2) the department determines that the employee, volunteer, or
contractor has been dismissed by the licensee within a reasonable
time after the licensee became aware of the conviction or
determination;
the criminal conviction of, or determination of child abuse or neglect
by, the former employee, former volunteer, or former contractor does
not constitute a sufficient basis for the revocation of a license.
(e) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 43. IC 31-27-5-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 273, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A license may be issued only
if the group home is in substantial compliance with food, health, safety,
and sanitation standards as determined under rules adopted by the
department under IC 31-27-2-4 or in accordance with a variance or
waiver approved by the department under IC 31-27-2-8.
(b) A license may be issued only if the group home is in compliance
with the fire and life safety rules as determined by the state fire marshal
under rules adopted by the department under IC 31-27-2-4 or in
accordance with a variance or waiver approved by the department
under IC 31-27-2-8.
(c) The department may issue a waiver or variance regarding a
determination by the state fire marshal or the department under
HEA 1202

36
subsections (a) and (b).
(b) Prior to the department issuing an initial license to an
applicant, the group home must be inspected and found to be in
substantial compliance with applicable building and fire safety
laws by the department of homeland security.
(c) Upon receipt of the initial application for a license:
(1) the department shall notify the department of homeland
security of the application; and
(2) the department of homeland security shall inspect the
group home.
SECTION 44. IC 31-27-5-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 303, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The department may place
a licensee on probationary status if the licensee is temporarily unable
to comply with a rule and if:
(1) the noncompliance does not present an immediate threat to the
health and well-being of the children in the care of the licensee;
(2) the licensee files a plan with the department or the Indiana
department of health or the state fire marshal to correct the areas
of noncompliance within the probationary period; and
(3) the department or the Indiana department of health or the state
fire marshal approves the plan.
(b) A probationary status period is for not more than six (6) months.
However, the department may extend a probationary status period for
one (1) additional period of six (6) months.
(c) At the expiration of a probationary status period, the department
shall:
(1) reactivate the license to the end of the original term of the
license;
(2) extend the probationary status period as permitted in
subsection (b); or
(3) revoke the license.
SECTION 45. IC 31-27-5-16, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 273, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) The department and the
state fire marshal shall do the following:
(1) Make annual onsite inspections.
(2) shall keep written records of the monitoring activities and
inspections.
(b) The department of homeland security shall perform
inspections of group homes in accordance with IC 22-14-2-11.
SECTION 46. IC 31-27-5-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.128-2012,
HEA 1202

37
SECTION 121, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. A licensee shall cooperate with
the department the state fire marshal, and any other state agency
working on behalf of the department in carrying out the activities
required by section 16 of this chapter, including permitting the
department, the state fire marshal, department of homeland security,
or any other state agency working on behalf of the department to
conduct announced or unannounced inspections.
SECTION 47. IC 31-27-5-31, AS AMENDED BY P.L.243-2019,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 31. (a) The following constitute sufficient grounds
for revocation of a license:
(1) A determination by the department of child abuse or neglect
by:
(A) the licensee; or
(B) an employee, volunteer, or contractor of the licensee.
(2) A criminal conviction of the licensee, or the director or
manager of a facility where children will be placed by the
licensee, for any of the following:
(A) A felony.
(B) A misdemeanor related to the health or safety of a child.
(C) A misdemeanor for operating a child caring institution,
foster family home, group home, or child placing agency
without a license under this article (or IC 12-17.4 before its
repeal).
(D) A misdemeanor for operating a child care center or child
care home without a license under IC 12-17.2.
(3) A determination by the department that the licensee made
false statements in the licensee's application for licensure.
(4) A determination by the department that the licensee made
false statements in the records required by the department.
(5) A determination by the department that:
(A) the licensee; or
(B) an employee, volunteer, or contractor of the licensee;
previously operated a home or facility without a license required
under any applicable provision of this article (or IC 12-17.4
before its repeal) or IC 12-17.2.
(6) A juvenile adjudication of the licensee for a nonwaivable
offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8 that, if committed by an
adult, would be a felony.
(7) A determination by the department that the operator of a
group home has failed to comply with an order of the
HEA 1202

38
department of homeland security.
(b) A license may also be revoked if an employee, volunteer, or
contractor of the licensee has had any of the following:
(1) A conviction of a nonwaivable offense, as defined in
IC 31-9-2-84.8.
(2) A conviction of any other felony or a misdemeanor relating to
the health and safety of a child, unless the licensee is granted a
waiver by the department with regard to the employee, volunteer,
or contractor.
(3) A juvenile adjudication for a nonwaivable offense, as defined
in IC 31-9-2-84.8 that, if committed by an adult, would be a
felony, unless the licensee is granted a waiver by the department
with regard to the employee, volunteer, or contractor.
(c) In determining whether to grant a waiver under subsection (b),
the department shall consider the following factors:
(1) The length of time that has passed since the disqualifying
conviction.
(2) The severity, nature, and circumstances of the offense.
(3) Evidence of rehabilitation.
(4) The duties and qualifications required for the proposed
employment positions, volunteer assignment, or contract.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a) or (b), if:
(1) a license could be revoked due to a criminal conviction of, or
a determination of child abuse or neglect by, an employee,
volunteer, or contractor of the licensee; and
(2) the department determines that the employee, volunteer, or
contractor has been dismissed by the licensee within a reasonable
time after the licensee became aware of the conviction;
the criminal conviction of, or determination of child abuse or neglect
by, the former employee, former volunteer, or former contractor does
not constitute a sufficient basis for the revocation of a license.
(e) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 48. IC 35-47.5-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 131, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The department shall carry out
a program to periodically inspect places where regulated explosives are
manufactured in accordance with IC 22-14-2-11.
SECTION 49. IC 35-50-2-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 12. The Indiana criminal justice institute shall review
characteristics of offenders committed to the department of correction
over such period of time it deems appropriate and of the offenses
committed by those offenders in order to ascertain norms used by the
HEA 1202

39
trial courts in sentencing. The Indiana criminal justice institute shall
from time to time publish its findings in the Indiana Register and
provide its findings to the legislative services agency and the judicial
conference of Indiana.
SECTION 50. IC 36-8-19.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Public Safety Improvement Areas).
SECTION 51. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) 260 IAC 3 is void.
The publisher of the Indiana Administrative Code and Indiana
Register shall remove 260 IAC 3 from the Indiana Administrative
Code.
(b) This SECTION expires January 1, 2027.
HEA 1202

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1202